ug.aff
FLAG num
SFX 15180 N 1
SFX 15180 0 لىرىمگە .

SFX 15181 N 1
SFX 15181 0 رەكى .

SFX 15182 N 1
SFX 15182 0 لىقتىنمۇ .

SFX 15183 N 1
SFX 15183 0 نامۇ .

SFX 15184 N 1
SFX 15184 0 ھىل .

SFX 15185 N 1
SFX 15185 0 ركەنمەن .

SFX 15186 N 1
SFX 15186 0 دىكىلەرمۇ .

SFX 15187 N 1
SFX 15187 0 تسەم .

SFX 15188 N 1
SFX 15188 0 انمىدى .

SFX 15189 N 1
SFX 15189 0 نەتتىم .

SFX 15190 N 1
SFX 15190 0 رسەن .

SFX 15191 N 1
SFX 15191 0 ڭلىرىنى .

SFX 15192 N 1
SFX 15192 0 ندەكمۇ .

SFX 15193 N 1
SFX 15193 0 رونىڭ .

SFX 15194 N 1
SFX 15194 0 ەنلىرىم .

SFX 15195 N 1
SFX 15195 0 شقانىدى .

SFX 15196 N 1
SFX 15196 0 ڭدىكى .

SFX 15197 N 1
SFX 15197 0 تلىدى .

SFX 15198 N 1
SFX 15198 0 رلىمەك .

SFX 15199 N 1
SFX 15199 0 ىسام .

SFX 15200 N 1
SFX 15200 0 لىسىز .

SFX 15201 N 1
SFX 15201 0 ىلاتماق .

SFX 15202 N 1
SFX 15202 0 ەتلىك .

SFX 15203 N 1
SFX 15203 0 ۇنلۇق .

SFX 15204 N 1
SFX 15204 0 انىلارغا .

SFX 15205 N 1
SFX 15205 0 فارماكولوگىيە .

SFX 15206 N 1
SFX 15206 0 تكەنلەر .

SFX 15207 N 1
SFX 15207 0 بتا .

SFX 15208 N 1
SFX 15208 0 لساڭلار .

SFX 15209 N 1
SFX 15209 0 شتۇرۇشتا .

SFX 15210 N 1
SFX 15210 0 يەلىرىنىڭ .

SFX 15211 N 1
SFX 15211 0 تلۈك .

SFX 15212 N 1
SFX 15212 0 غىڭىز .

SFX 15213 N 1
SFX 15213 0 دىتىش .

SFX 15214 N 1
SFX 15214 0 دۈرەتتى .

SFX 15215 N 1
SFX 15215 0 نماق .

SFX 15216 N 1
SFX 15216 0 ورەكنىڭ .

SFX 15217 N 1
SFX 15217 0 ۈزگەن .

SFX 15218 N 1
SFX 15218 0 زارىنى .

SFX 15219 N 1
SFX 15219 0 دىغانلارنى .

SFX 15220 N 1
SFX 15220 0 غىنىمۇ .

SFX 15221 N 1
SFX 15221 0 پتار .

SFX 15222 N 1
SFX 15222 0 ىشىۋاتقانلىقى .

SFX 15223 N 1
SFX 15223 0 ىدىغانلارنى .

SFX 15224 N 1
SFX 15224 0 زارلىرى .

SFX 15225 N 1
SFX 15225 0 ياپچان .

SFX 15226 N 1
SFX 15226 0 اشسۇن .

SFX 15227 N 1
SFX 15227 0 نلەردىن .

SFX 15228 N 1
SFX 15228 0 داقلارنى .

SFX 15229 N 1
SFX 15229 0 اڭلىماق .

SFX 15230 N 1
SFX 15230 0 خانمۇ .

SFX 15231 N 1
SFX 15231 0 ىينى .

SFX 15232 N 1
SFX 15232 0 ىۋىزم .

SFX 15233 N 1
SFX 15233 0 كاننى .

SFX 15234 N 1
SFX 15234 0 ۇلاقلار .

SFX 15235 N 1
SFX 15235 0 دۇرغۇچ .

SFX 15236 N 1
SFX 15236 0 جاڭ .

SFX 15237 N 1
SFX 15237 0 يدىغانلاردىن .

SFX 15238 N 1
SFX 15238 0 مىگەچ .

SFX 15239 N 1
SFX 15239 0 مەننى .

SFX 15240 N 1
SFX 15240 0 گىزمۇ .

SFX 15241 N 1
SFX 15241 0 تىنمۇ .

SFX 15242 N 1
SFX 15242 0 لىكتە .

SFX 15243 N 1
SFX 15243 0 بىرى .

SFX 15244 N 1
SFX 15244 0 خانىلىرىدا .

SFX 15245 N 1
SFX 15245 0 بوغا .

SFX 15246 N 1
SFX 15246 0 يىمىزگە .

SFX 15247 N 1
SFX 15247 0 ېرىكى .

SFX 15248 N 1
SFX 15248 0 زلىقلارنىڭ .

SFX 15249 N 1
SFX 15249 0 تىسىدىن .

SFX 15250 N 1
SFX 15250 0 ئۇششاق .

SFX 15251 N 1
SFX 15251 0 ينىمۇ .

SFX 15252 N 1
SFX 15252 0 ۇن .

SFX 15253 N 1
SFX 15253 0 قانلىرىدا .

SFX 15254 N 1
SFX 15254 0 غاپ .

SFX 15255 N 1
SFX 15255 0 ەتمەيلى .

SFX 15256 N 1
SFX 15256 0 ىدىغانلىقىنى .

SFX 15257 N 1
SFX 15257 0 ىرىمىزدىمۇ .

SFX 15258 N 1
SFX 15258 0 چراق .

SFX 15259 N 1
SFX 15259 0 ىشىممۇ .

SFX 15260 N 1
SFX 15260 0 پنە .

SFX 15261 N 1
SFX 15261 0 ۋ .

SFX 15262 N 1
SFX 15262 0 رىمىزدىكى .

SFX 15263 N 1
SFX 15263 0 انلىرىدىن .

SFX 15264 N 1
SFX 15264 0 المايسەن .

SFX 15265 N 1
SFX 15265 0 تقۇچىغا .

SFX 15266 N 1
SFX 15266 0 ىندىن .

SFX 15267 N 1
SFX 15267 0 خو .

SFX 15268 N 1
SFX 15268 0 نىدىغان .

SFX 15269 N 1
SFX 15269 0 سىڭىل .

SFX 15270 N 1
SFX 15270 0 ەنلىرىمۇ .

SFX 15271 N 1
SFX 15271 0 ىقىڭىزنىڭ .

SFX 15272 N 1
SFX 15272 0 ىرىلىش .

SFX 15273 N 1
SFX 15273 0 ىرايدۇ .

SFX 15274 N 1
SFX 15274 0 نامە .

SFX 15275 N 1
SFX 15275 0 ۈۋالىدىغان .

SFX 15276 N 1
SFX 15276 0 رگەندىن .

SFX 15277 N 1
SFX 15277 0 قۇ .

SFX 15278 N 1
SFX 15278 0 ىزلاندۇرۇلماق .

SFX 15279 N 1
SFX 15279 0 نتلارنى .

SFX 15280 N 1
SFX 15280 0 نكەن .

SFX 15281 N 1
SFX 15281 0 ىرىڭىز .

SFX 15282 N 1
SFX 15282 0 ۈرۈلىدۇ .

SFX 15283 N 1
SFX 15283 0 ەرمەنمۇ .

SFX 15284 N 1
SFX 15284 0 گەنلىكتىن .

SFX 15285 N 1
SFX 15285 0 انالىق .

SFX 15286 N 1
SFX 15286 0 كەنلىكىم .

SFX 15287 N 1
SFX 15287 0 يىمىزمۇ .

SFX 15288 N 1
SFX 15288 0 يىنمۇ .

SFX 15289 N 1
SFX 15289 0 ەتلىرىنى .

SFX 15290 N 1
SFX 15290 0 لدايدۇ .

SFX 15291 N 1
SFX 15291 0 لىۋەتكەن .

SFX 15292 N 1
SFX 15292 0 رغۇ .

SFX 15293 N 1
SFX 15293 0 پتىغۇ .

SFX 15294 N 1
SFX 15294 0 ىمەيلى .

SFX 15295 N 1
SFX 15295 0 قانلىقىم .

SFX 15296 N 1
SFX 15296 0 ەكلەردە .

SFX 15297 N 1
SFX 15297 0 ۋالاتتى .

SFX 15298 N 1
SFX 15298 0 دىيەدىن .

SFX 15299 N 1
SFX 15299 0 پايىم .

SFX 15300 N 1
SFX 15300 0 كە .

SFX 15301 N 1
SFX 15301 0 رتىشىش .

SFX 15302 N 1
SFX 15302 0 سەڭچۇ .

SFX 15303 N 1
SFX 15303 0 ۈشلەرنى .

SFX 15304 N 1
SFX 15304 0 ىغىنىڭنى .

SFX 15305 N 1
SFX 15305 0 رېلې .

SFX 15306 N 1
SFX 15306 0 ۈۋاتقانلىقى .

SFX 15307 N 1
SFX 15307 0 ىكرەك .

SFX 15308 N 1
SFX 15308 0 تماسلىق .

SFX 15309 N 1
SFX 15309 0 كەنمەن .

SFX 15310 N 1
SFX 15310 0 نلۇقتا .

SFX 15311 N 1
SFX 15311 0 وزىدىن .

SFX 15312 N 1
SFX 15312 0 اشلانماق .

SFX 15313 N 1
SFX 15313 0 ىلىشنى .

SFX 15314 N 1
SFX 15314 0 شتۈرسە .

SFX 15315 N 1
SFX 15315 0 ەرىنى .

SFX 15316 N 1
SFX 15316 0 ەنسىز .

SFX 15317 N 1
SFX 15317 0 گەنلىكىمدىن .

SFX 15318 N 1
SFX 15318 0 -دەپ .

SFX 15319 N 1
SFX 15319 0 ۆزىنى .

SFX 15320 N 1
SFX 15320 0 خوزا .

SFX 15321 N 1
SFX 15321 0 دىلە .

SFX 15322 N 1
SFX 15322 0 دىلەرنى .

SFX 15323 N 1
SFX 15323 0 لمامدۇ .

SFX 15324 N 1
SFX 15324 0 شىيدۇ .

SFX 15325 N 1
SFX 15325 0 سادا .

SFX 15326 N 1
SFX 15326 0 ىتىدىنمۇ .

SFX 15327 N 1
SFX 15327 0 لاقلار .

SFX 15328 N 1
SFX 15328 0 ەللىرى .

SFX 15329 N 1
SFX 15329 0 زلىرى .

SFX 15330 N 1
SFX 15330 0 -قاچا .

SFX 15331 N 1
SFX 15331 0 شمىسا .

SFX 15332 N 1
SFX 15332 0 ملىقىنى .

SFX 15333 N 1
SFX 15333 0 ۋىيەلىك .

SFX 15334 N 1
SFX 15334 0 ەررە .

SFX 15335 N 1
SFX 15335 0 ۇشۇپ .

SFX 15336 N 1
SFX 15336 0 ىيىۋاتقان .

SFX 15337 N 1
SFX 15337 0 لىمەكتە .

SFX 15338 N 1
SFX 15338 0 اتقانلىقىدىن .

SFX 15339 N 1
SFX 15339 0 ەيلەن .

SFX 15340 N 1
SFX 15340 0 قىراق .

SFX 15341 N 1
SFX 15341 0 مىغاندىن .

SFX 15342 N 1
SFX 15342 0 نكىن .

SFX 15343 N 1
SFX 15343 0 لىقنىڭمۇ .

SFX 15344 N 1
SFX 15344 0 مىزدا .

SFX 15345 N 1
SFX 15345 0 پىقى .

SFX 15346 N 1
SFX 15346 0 كىگە .

SFX 15347 N 1
SFX 15347 0 انلىقنى .

SFX 15348 N 1
SFX 15348 0 تساڭ .

SFX 15349 N 1
SFX 15349 0 ىپى .

SFX 15350 N 1
SFX 15350 0 ىلىمات .

SFX 15351 N 1
SFX 15351 0 پاش .

SFX 15352 N 1
SFX 15352 0 ىناق .

SFX 15353 N 1
SFX 15353 0 مەنلىكى .

SFX 15354 N 1
SFX 15354 0 سېرى .

SFX 15355 N 1
SFX 15355 0 خانىمىزغا .

SFX 15356 N 1
SFX 15356 0 پىدۇر .

SFX 15357 N 1
SFX 15357 0 غىنىمدا .

SFX 15358 N 1
SFX 15358 0 ۇلۇقمۇ .

SFX 15359 N 1
SFX 15359 0 ۈنىدىن .

SFX 15360 N 1
SFX 15360 0 ۋېتىلمىگەن .

SFX 15361 N 1
SFX 15361 0 ۇشىچە .

SFX 15362 N 1
SFX 15362 0 ۇقۇم .

SFX 15363 N 1
SFX 15363 0 سىزدۇر .

SFX 15364 N 1
SFX 15364 0 غۇڭىز .

SFX 15365 N 1
SFX 15365 0 ىدلىشىش .

SFX 15366 N 1
SFX 15366 0 ەپنى .

SFX 15367 N 1
SFX 15367 0 ىنىنىڭ .

SFX 15368 N 1
SFX 15368 0 رسەنمۇ .

SFX 15369 N 1
SFX 15369 0 اسىنى .

SFX 15370 N 1
SFX 15370 0 سار .

SFX 15371 N 1
SFX 15371 0 مىنال .

SFX 15372 N 1
SFX 15372 0 ەلەردە .

SFX 15373 N 1
SFX 15373 0 -سەلەڭ .

SFX 15374 N 1
SFX 15374 0 ورتىنىڭ .

SFX 15375 N 1
SFX 15375 0 قانمىدۇ .

SFX 15376 N 1
SFX 15376 0 ۋېلىشنىڭ .

SFX 15377 N 1
SFX 15377 0 زلاشماق .

SFX 15378 N 1
SFX 15378 0 ىزمنىڭ .

SFX 15379 N 1
SFX 15379 0 -غۇژ .

SFX 15380 N 1
SFX 15380 0 ەتكەندەك .

SFX 15381 N 1
SFX 15381 0 يالىت .

SFX 15382 N 1
SFX 15382 0 ۋېرىپ .

SFX 15383 N 1
SFX 15383 0 لىشىدىن .

SFX 15384 N 1
SFX 15384 0 قۇمدا .

SFX 15385 N 1
SFX 15385 0 ۇراتتى .

SFX 15386 N 1
SFX 15386 0 ۋېتىمىز .

SFX 15387 N 1
SFX 15387 0 ىمىزدىن .

SFX 15388 N 1
SFX 15388 0 ھەرپ .

SFX 15389 N 1
SFX 15389 0 امىلەرنىڭ .

SFX 15390 N 1
SFX 15390 0 المىسا .

SFX 15391 N 1
SFX 15391 0 دۈرىدىكەن .

SFX 15392 N 1
SFX 15392 0 نىڭىزنى .

SFX 15393 N 1
SFX 15393 0 ۈرسە .

SFX 15394 N 1
SFX 15394 0 دىنىنى .

SFX 15395 N 1
SFX 15395 0 ەنگەندىن .

SFX 15396 N 1
SFX 15396 0 دلەر .

SFX 15397 N 1
SFX 15397 0 الماسلىقىڭ .

SFX 15398 N 1
SFX 15398 0 غىلمان .

SFX 15399 N 1
SFX 15399 0 ڭلىشىپ .

SFX 15400 N 1
SFX 15400 0 لالايمىز .

SFX 15401 N 1
SFX 15401 0 كلاردىن .

SFX 15402 N 1
SFX 15402 0 -ئۇسسۇل .

SFX 15403 N 1
SFX 15403 0 ۋالىدىغان .

SFX 15404 N 1
SFX 15404 0 شقانلارنىڭ .

SFX 15405 N 1
SFX 15405 0 ىنىشىپ .

SFX 15406 N 1
SFX 15406 0 ىدىڭمۇ .

SFX 15407 N 1
SFX 15407 0 تايغا .

SFX 15408 N 1
SFX 15408 0 لىساق .

SFX 15409 N 1
SFX 15409 0 اشلىرىدىن .

SFX 15410 N 1
SFX 15410 0 ېدا .

SFX 15411 N 1
SFX 15411 0 چىۋىن .

SFX 15412 N 1
SFX 15412 0 ايدىغۇ .

SFX 15413 N 1
SFX 15413 0 ارلارغا .

SFX 15414 N 1
SFX 15414 0 مىغانغا .

SFX 15415 N 1
SFX 15415 0 سسىز .

SFX 15416 N 1
SFX 15416 0 وۋۇق .

SFX 15417 N 1
SFX 15417 0 نىپمۇ .

SFX 15418 N 1
SFX 15418 0 ۇقنىڭ .

SFX 15419 N 1
SFX 15419 0 لگەندە .

SFX 15420 N 1
SFX 15420 0 شۇناسى .

SFX 15421 N 1
SFX 15421 0 رمەيدۇ .

SFX 15422 N 1
SFX 15422 0 غۇچىلاردا .

SFX 15423 N 1
SFX 15423 0 ەنلىرىنى .

SFX 15424 N 1
SFX 15424 0 ىرىمىزغا .

SFX 15425 N 1
SFX 15425 0 شمايلا .

SFX 15426 N 1
SFX 15426 0 اندىن .

SFX 15427 N 1
SFX 15427 0 كتونىكا .

SFX 15428 N 1
SFX 15428 0 اپچىلىق .

SFX 15429 N 1
SFX 15429 0 لاشتۇرۇشىغا .

SFX 15430 N 1
SFX 15430 0 ىيلىق .

SFX 15431 N 1
SFX 15431 0 ۋۇلى .

SFX 15432 N 1
SFX 15432 0 ەلمىسەڭ .

SFX 15433 N 1
SFX 15433 0 تتىڭغۇ .

SFX 15434 N 1
SFX 15434 0 ىي .

SFX 15435 N 1
SFX 15435 0 يلاپ .

SFX 15436 N 1
SFX 15436 0 لىۋېتىپ .

SFX 15437 N 1
SFX 15437 0 پاندىكى .

SFX 15438 N 1
SFX 15438 0 ەتتىمۇ .

SFX 15439 N 1
SFX 15439 0 لدۈرۈش .

SFX 15440 N 1
SFX 15440 0 مەيدىغانلىقىنى .

SFX 15441 N 1
SFX 15441 0 لىنغا .

SFX 15442 N 1
SFX 15442 0 لاردىكىدەك .

SFX 15443 N 1
SFX 15443 0 جاڭنى .

SFX 15444 N 1
SFX 15444 0 قۇرتى .

SFX 15445 N 1
SFX 15445 0 مائارىپ .

SFX 15446 N 1
SFX 15446 0 ەلمىگەندە .

SFX 15447 N 1
SFX 15447 0 ورلۇقى .

SFX 15448 N 1
SFX 15448 0 يدىغاندۇ .

SFX 15449 N 1
SFX 15449 0 لداشلىرى .

SFX 15450 N 1
SFX 15450 0 سۇر .

SFX 15451 N 1
SFX 15451 0 كلۈك .

SFX 15452 N 1
SFX 15452 0 ڭىزلا .

SFX 15453 N 1
SFX 15453 0 جىسى .

SFX 15454 N 1
SFX 15454 0 چىلىقنى .

SFX 15455 N 1
SFX 15455 0 لىنىشقا .

SFX 15456 N 1
SFX 15456 0 ۈرۈلدى .

SFX 15457 N 1
SFX 15457 0 يولىت .

SFX 15458 N 1
SFX 15458 0 شتۈرۈل .

SFX 15459 N 1
SFX 15459 0 جا .

SFX 15460 N 1
SFX 15460 0 تىكىغا .

SFX 15461 N 1
SFX 15461 0 ۋىتى .

SFX 15462 N 1
SFX 15462 0 تاغدىكى .

SFX 15463 N 1
SFX 15463 0 رىپتىمەن .

SFX 15464 N 1
SFX 15464 0 ىلتىرىق .

SFX 15465 N 1
SFX 15465 0 كەشمەك .

SFX 15466 N 1
SFX 15466 0 ۋاتقانلىقىمىزنى .

SFX 15467 N 1
SFX 15467 0 ېرىشكە .

SFX 15468 N 1
SFX 15468 0 دايدىغان .

SFX 15469 N 1
SFX 15469 0 ۈرۈشۈش .

SFX 15470 N 1
SFX 15470 0 ستوۋن .

SFX 15471 N 1
SFX 15471 0 ئون .

SFX 15472 N 1
SFX 15472 0 رلاردا .

SFX 15473 N 1
SFX 15473 0 اپتەك .

SFX 15474 N 1
SFX 15474 0 ىۋېتىپتۇ .

SFX 15475 N 1
SFX 15475 0 دىغانسەن .

SFX 15476 N 1
SFX 15476 0 لەشتۈرگۈچ .

SFX 15477 N 1
SFX 15477 0 نگۈدەك .

SFX 15478 N 1
SFX 15478 0 اكى .

SFX 15479 N 1
SFX 15479 0 تقانىكەن .

SFX 15480 N 1
SFX 15480 0 ىكەنسىز .

SFX 15481 N 1
SFX 15481 0 ئۆكسۈك .

SFX 15482 N 1
SFX 15482 0 رىيەدە .

SFX 15483 N 1
SFX 15483 0 تىسىنىڭ .

SFX 15484 N 1
SFX 15484 0 لارغىچە .

SFX 15485 N 1
SFX 15485 0 ۋىچ .

SFX 15486 N 1
SFX 15486 0 شگۈل .

SFX 15487 N 1
SFX 15487 0 چىلىرىدە .

SFX 15488 N 1
SFX 15488 0 رىلەر .

SFX 15489 N 1
SFX 15489 0 ىلىقتا .

SFX 15490 N 1
SFX 15490 0 ەملىكنى .

SFX 15491 N 1
SFX 15491 0 ۇنۇس .

SFX 15492 N 1
SFX 15492 0 تىغىچە .

SFX 15493 N 1
SFX 15493 0 تىڭىزغۇ .

SFX 15494 N 1
SFX 15494 0 ەپلىمەك .

SFX 15495 N 1
SFX 15495 0 للىرىدە .

SFX 15496 N 1
SFX 15496 0 دىڭما .

SFX 15497 N 1
SFX 15497 0 انام .

SFX 15498 N 1
SFX 15498 0 لەشتىكى .

SFX 15499 N 1
SFX 15499 0 ردۇر .

SFX 15500 N 1
SFX 15500 0 ۇلداپ .

SFX 15501 N 1
SFX 15501 0 -داقاڭ .

SFX 15502 N 1
SFX 15502 0 اتسىمان .

SFX 15503 N 1
SFX 15503 0 ىيەتلەرنىڭ .

SFX 15504 N 1
SFX 15504 0 ىغىچە .

SFX 15505 N 1
SFX 15505 0 مىكى .

SFX 15506 N 1
SFX 15506 0 مىتى .

SFX 15507 N 1
SFX 15507 0 ايدىغاندۇ .

SFX 15508 N 1
SFX 15508 0 ىقىڭىزدىن .

SFX 15509 N 1
SFX 15509 0 رچىلىقنىڭ .

SFX 15510 N 1
SFX 15510 0 تساق .
